North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-33 Nonprofit Corporations
10-33-38.
Board vacancies.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, and except as provided in this section, if a vacancy occurs on the board, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:

The members with voting rights, if any, may fill the vacancy; or

The remaining members of the board, though less than a quorum, may fill the vacancy.

If a vacant office was held by a director elected by a class, chapter, or other organizational unit or by region or other geographic grouping, only members with voting rights of the class, chapter, unit, or grouping are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy.

If a vacant office was held by an appointed director, only the person who appointed the director may fill the vacancy.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2011, ch. 87, § 46.

10-33-39.
Board meetings.

Meetings of the board may be held from time to time as provided in the articles or bylaws at any place within or without the state that the board may select or by any means described in subsection 2.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, a meeting of the board must be held at least once per year.

If the articles, bylaws, or board fails to select a place or method for selecting a place for a meeting, the meeting must be held at the principal executive office.

Participation in a meeting by a means set forth in subsection 2 constitutes presence in person at the meeting.

Any meeting among directors may be conducted:

Solely by one or more means of remote communication through which all of the directors may participate in the meeting:

If the notice required by subsection 3 is given for the meeting; and

If the number of directors participating in the meeting is sufficient to constitute a quorum at a meeting.

By means of conference telephone or, if authorized by the board, by such other means of remote communication, in each case through which that director, other directors so participating, and all directors physically present at the meeting participate with each other during the meeting.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide for a different time period, a director may call a board meeting by giving at least ten days’ notice or, in the case of organizational meetings pursuant to subsection 2 of section 10-33-25, at least three days’ notice, to all directors of the date, time, and place of the meeting.

The notice must contain the substance of any proposed amendment to the articles but otherwise need not state the purpose of the meeting unless the articles or bylaws require it.

Any notice to a director given under any provision of this chapter, the articles, or the bylaws by a form of electronic communication consented to by the director to whom the notice is given is effective when given.

Consent by a director to notice given by electronic communication may be given in writing or by authenticated electronic communication. Any consent so given may be relied upon until revoked by the director, provided that no revocation affects the validity of any notice given before receipt of revocation of the consent.

If the date, time, and place of a board meeting have been provided in the articles or bylaws, or announced at a previous meeting of the board, no notice is required. Notice of an adjourned meeting need not be given other than by announcement at the meeting at which adjournment is taken.

A director may waive notice of a meeting of the board. A waiver of notice by a director entitled to notice is effective whether given before, at, or after the meeting, and whether given in writing, by authenticated electronic communication, or by attendance. Attendance by a director at a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting, except when the director objects at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and does not participate in the meeting after the objection.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 98; 2005, ch. 100, § 101; 2009, ch. 106, § 49; 2011, ch. 87, § 47.

10-33-40.
Absent directors.

If the articles or bylaws so provide, a director may give advance written consent or opposition to a proposal to be acted on at a board meeting. If the director is not present at the meeting, consent or opposition to a proposal does not constitute presence for purposes of determining the existence of a quorum, but consent or opposition must be counted as the vote of a director present at the meeting in favor of or against the proposal and must be entered in the minutes or other record of action at the meeting, if the proposal acted on at the meeting is substantially the same or has substantially the same effect as the proposal to which the director has consented or objected.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-41.
Quorum of directors.

A majority, or a larger or smaller proportion or number provided in the articles or bylaws, of the directors currently holding office is a quorum for the transaction of business. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn a meeting from time to time until a quorum is present. If a quorum is present when a duly called or held meeting is convened, the directors present may continue to transact business until adjournment, even though the withdrawal of a number of directors originally present leaves less than the proportion or number otherwise required for a quorum.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-42.
Act of the board.

The board shall take action by the affirmative vote of a majority of directors with voting rights present and entitled to vote at a duly held meeting, unless this chapter or the articles or bylaws require the affirmative vote of a larger proportion or number.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-43.
Action without meeting by directors.

An action required or permitted to be taken at a board meeting may be taken by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by all of the directors. If the articles so provide, any action, other than an action requiring approval of members with voting rights, may be taken by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by the number of directors that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the board at which all directors were present.

The written action is effective when signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by the required number of directors, unless a different effective time is provided in the written action.

When written action is permitted to be taken by less than all directors, all directors must be notified immediately of its text and effective date. Failure to provide the notice does not invalidate the written action. A director who does not sign or consent to the written action has no liability for the action or actions taken thereby.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 99; 2011, ch. 87, § 48.

10-33-44.
Board committees.

A resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors currently holding office may establish committees having the authority of the board in the management of the activities of the corporation to the extent provided in the resolution. Committees may include a special litigation committee consisting of one or more independent directors or other independent persons to consider legal rights or remedies of the corporation and whether those rights or remedies should be pursued. Committees other than special litigation committees are subject at all times to the direction and control of the board.

Committee members must be individuals. Unless the articles or bylaws provide for a different membership or manner of appointment, a committee must consist of one or more persons, who need not be directors, appointed by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present.

Sections 10-33-39 through 10-33-43 apply to committees and members of committees to the same extent as those sections apply to the board and directors.

Minutes, if any, of committee meetings must be made available upon request to members of the committee and to any director.

The establishment of, delegation of authority to, and action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standard of conduct set forth in section 10-33-45.

Committee members are deemed to be directors for purposes of sections 10-33-45, 10-33-46, and 10-33-84.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, the bylaws, or the resolution of the board establishing the committee, a committee may create one or more subcommittees, each consisting of one or more members of the committee, and may delegate to a subcommittee any or all of the authority of the committee. In this chapter, unless the language or context clearly indicates that a different meaning is intended:

Any reference to a committee is deemed to include a subcommittee; and

Any reference to a committee member is deemed to include any reference to a subcommittee member.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 100; 2007, ch. 101, § 64; 2009, ch. 106, § 50; 2011, ch. 87, § 49.

10-33-45.
Standard of conduct for directors.

A director shall discharge the duties of the position of director in good faith, in a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation, and with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances. A person who so performs those duties is not liable by reason of being or having been a director of the corporation.

A director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, in each case prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters that the director reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board upon which the director does not serve, duly established in accordance with section 10-33-44 as to matters within its designated authority, if the director reasonably believes the committee to merit confidence.

Subsection 2 does not apply to a director who has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes the reliance otherwise permitted by subsection 2 unwarranted.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board when an action is approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present is presumed to have assented to the action approved, unless the director:

Objects at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and does not participate in the meeting, in which case the director may not be considered to be present at the meeting for any purpose of this chapter;

Votes against the action at the meeting; or

Is prohibited from voting on the action:

By the articles;

By the bylaws;

As the result of the decision to approve, ratify, or authorize a transaction pursuant to section 10-33-46; or

By a conflict of interest policy adopted by the board.

A director, regardless of how identified, is not considered to be a trustee with respect to the corporation or with respect to property held or administered by the corporation, including without limit, property that may be subject to restrictions imposed by the donor or transferor of the property.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-46.
Director conflicts of interest.

A contract or other transaction between a corporation and its director or a member of the family of its director; a director of a related organization, or a member of the family of a director of a related organization; or an organization in or of which the corporation’s director, or a member of the family of its director, is a director, officer, or legal representative or has a material financial interest, is not void or voidable because the director or the other individual or organization are parties or because the director is present at the meeting of the members or the board or a committee at which the contract or transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified, if at least one of the requirements of subsection 2 is satisfied.

A contract or transaction described in subsection 1 is not void or voidable if:

The contract or transaction was, and the person asserting the validity of the contract or transaction has the burden of establishing that the contract or transaction was, fair and reasonable as to the corporation when it was authorized, approved, or ratified;

The material facts as to the contract or transaction and as to the director’s interest are fully disclosed or known to the members and the contract or transaction is approved in good faith by two-thirds of the members entitled to vote, not counting any vote that the interested director might otherwise have, or the unanimous affirmative vote of all members, whether or not entitled to vote;

The material facts as to the contract or transaction and as to the director’s interest are fully disclosed or known to the board or a committee, and the board or committee authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction in good faith by a majority of directors or committee members currently holding office. However, the interested director or directors may not vote and are not considered for purposes of a quorum. If as a result the number of remaining directors is not sufficient to reach a quorum, then a quorum for the purpose of considering the contract or transaction is the number of remaining directors or committee members, not counting any vote that the interested director might otherwise have, and not counting the director in determining the presence of a quorum; or

The contract or transaction is a merger or consolidation described in section 10-33-85.

For purposes of this section:

A director does not have a material financial interest in a resolution fixing the compensation of the director or fixing the compensation of another director as a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, even though the first director is also receiving compensation from the corporation;

A director has a material financial interest in an organization in which the director, or a member of the family of the director, has a material financial interest; and

A “member of the family” of a director is a spouse, parent, child, child of a spouse, brother, sister, or the spouse of any of them.

The procedures described under subdivisions a, b, and c of subsection 2 are not required if the contract or other transaction is between related organizations.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2009, ch. 106, § 51; 2011, ch. 87, § 50.

10-33-47.
Immunity of officers, directors, and trustees.

Any person that serves as a director, officer, or trustee of a corporation that is, or would qualify as a nonprofit organization that is described in paragraphs 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 10, and 19 of section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (10), and (19)], is immune from civil liability for any act or omission resulting in damage or injury if at the time of the act or omission all of the following are met:

The officer, director, or trustee was acting in good faith and in the scope of that person’s official duties as a director, officer, or trustee.

The act or omission did not constitute willful misconduct or gross negligence on the part of the officer, director, or trustee.

The officer, director, or trustee did not receive or expect to receive reimbursement for or payment of expenses in excess of two thousand dollars per year for expenses actually incurred as a result of providing services as a director, officer, or trustee, and did not receive or expect to receive compensation or anything in lieu of compensation as payment for services provided as a director, officer, or trustee.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 102.

10-33-48.
Immunity of volunteers.

Any person who, on a volunteer basis, provides services or performs duties on behalf of a corporation is immune from civil liability for any act or omission resulting in damage or injury if at the time of the act or omission all of the following are met:

The person who caused the damage or injury was acting in good faith and in the scope of that person’s duties as a volunteer for the corporation.

The act or omission did not constitute willful misconduct or gross negligence.

This section does not grant immunity to any person causing damage as the result of the negligent operation of a motor vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-49.
Officers.

The officers of a corporation must be individuals who are eighteen years of age or more exercising the functions of the offices and:

Must include a president and a secretary, however designated; and

May also include a treasurer, one or more vice presidents, and any other officers, however designated, as may be prescribed by the bylaws.

Unless the articles or the bylaws provide that the members with voting rights may elect the officers:

Each officer must be elected by the board at the time and in the manner as may be provided in the bylaws; or

To the extent authorized in the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present, the president may appoint one or more officers, other than the treasurer.

Unless otherwise provided, president shall mean chief executive officer and treasurer shall mean chief financial officer.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 137; 2011, ch. 87, § 51.

10-33-50.
Duties of officers and agents.

Unless the articles, bylaws, or a resolution adopted by the board, which is not inconsistent with the articles or bylaws, provides otherwise:

The president shall:

Have general active management for the activities of the corporation;

When present, preside at all meetings of the board and of members;

See that all orders and resolutions of the board are carried into effect;

Sign and deliver in the name of the corporation any deeds, mortgages, bonds, contracts, or other instruments pertaining to the business of the corporation, except in cases in which the authority to sign and deliver is required by law to be exercised by another person or is expressly delegated by the articles or bylaws or by the board to some officer or agent of the corporation;

Maintain records of and, whenever necessary, certify all proceedings of the board and the members; and

Perform other duties prescribed by the board.

The vice president, if any, or, if there is more than one, the vice presidents in the order determined by the board, shall:

In the absence or disability of the president, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the president; and

Perform any other duties and shall have such other powers as the board may from time to time prescribe.

The treasurer, if any, shall:

Keep accurate financial records for the corporation;

Deposit all money, drafts, and checks in the name of and to the credit of the corporation in the banks and depositories designated by the board;

Endorse for deposit all notes, checks, and drafts received by the corporation as ordered by the board, making proper vouchers;

Disburse corporate funds and issue checks and drafts in the name of the corporation, as ordered by the board;

Give to the president and the board, when requested, an account of all transactions by the treasurer and of the financial condition of the corporation; and

Perform other duties prescribed by the board or by the president.

The secretary shall:

Attend all meetings of the board, all meetings of the members and, when required, all meetings of standing committees;

Record all proceedings of the meetings;

Give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the members and meetings of the board; and

Perform other duties prescribed by the board.

All other officers and agents of the corporation, as between themselves and the corporation, have the authority and shall perform the duties in the management of the corporation as may be provided in the articles or bylaws, or as may be determined by resolution of the board not inconsistent with the articles and bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 138; 2003, ch. 85, § 101.

10-33-51.
Multiple offices.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, any number of offices or functions of those offices may be held or exercised by the same individual. If a record must be signed by individuals holding different offices or functions and an individual holds or exercises more than one of those offices or functions, that individual may sign the record in more than one capacity, but only if the record indicates each capacity in which the individual signs.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 103; 2011, ch. 87, § 52.

10-33-52.
Officers deemed elected.

In the absence of an election or appointment of officers by the board or the members with voting rights, the individual or individuals exercising the functions of the principal officers of the corporation are deemed to have been elected to those offices.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2011, ch. 87, § 53.

10-33-53.
Contract rights.

The election or appointment of an individual as an officer or agent does not, of itself, create contract rights. However, a corporation may enter into a contract with an officer or agent. The resignation or removal of an officer or agent is without prejudice to any contractual rights or obligations. The fact that the contract may be for a term that is longer than the terms of the directors who authorized or approved the contract does not make the contract void or voidable.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-54.
Resignation, removal, and vacancies for officers.

An officer may resign by giving written notice to the corporation. The resignation is effective without acceptance when the notice is given to the corporation, unless a later effective date is specified in the notice.

With respect to removal:

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, an officer may be removed at any time, with or without cause, by a resolution adopted by the board or by the members with voting rights, whichever elected or appointed the officer.

An officer appointed by the president may also be removed at any time, with or without cause, by the president.

To the extent authorized in the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present, the president of a corporation may remove an officer elected or appointed by the board, other than the treasurer.

The articles or the bylaws may provide other manners of removing an officer.

A removal as described in this subsection is without prejudice to any contractual rights of the officer.

A vacancy in an office because of death, resignation, removal, disqualification, or other cause may, or in the case of a vacancy in the office of treasurer, if any, or president, must be filled for the unexpired part of the term in the manner provided in the articles or bylaws as determined by the board, or under section 10-33-52.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 139; 2011, ch. 87, § 54.

10-33-55.
Delegation by officers.

Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws or by a resolution adopted by the board, an officer elected or appointed by the board, without the approval of the board, may delegate some or all of the duties and powers of an office to other individuals. An officer who delegates the duties or powers of an office remains subject to the standard of conduct for an officer with respect to the discharge of all duties and powers so delegated.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-56.
Standard of conduct for officers.

An officer shall discharge the duties of an office in good faith, in a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation, and with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances. An individual exercising the principal functions of an office or to whom some or all of the duties and powers of an office are delegated pursuant to section 10-33-55 is deemed an officer for purposes of this section and sections 10-33-81 and 10-33-84.

An officer is not considered to be a trustee with respect to the corporation or with respect to property held or administered by the corporation, including without limit, property that may be subject to restrictions imposed by the donor or transferor of the property.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-57.
Members.

A corporation may have one or more classes of members or may have no members. In the absence of a provision in its articles or bylaws providing for members, a corporation has no members.

If a corporation has no members, an action for which there is no specific provision of this chapter applicable to a corporation without members and that would otherwise require approval of the members requires only the approval of the board.

A reference in this chapter to a corporation that has no members includes a corporation in which the directors are the only members.

A corporation may admit any person as a member.

The articles or bylaws may establish criteria or procedures for admission.

A person may not be admitted as a member without the person’s express or implied consent.

For purposes of this subdivision, consent includes acceptance of membership benefits knowing that the benefits are available only to members, or taking some other affirmative action that confers membership benefits.

If the articles or bylaws provide that a person who contributes to the corporation is a member, a contribution is consent.

Except as provided in its articles or bylaws, a corporation may admit members for no consideration or for consideration as is determined by the board.

Members are of one class unless the articles establish, or authorize the bylaws to establish, more than one class. Members are entitled to vote and have equal rights and preferences except to the extent that the articles or bylaws have fixed or limited the rights and preferences of members or different classes of members or provide for nonvoting members. The articles or bylaws may fix the term of membership.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

Collateral References.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection, or use of membership list, 37 A.L.R.4th 1206.

10-33-58.
Membership certificates.

A corporation may issue certificates showing membership in the corporation. In lieu of a membership certificate, a corporation may issue preferred or common shares. Shares may be issued upon the terms and conditions that the board considers appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-59.
Transfer of membership.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws, a member of a corporation may not transfer a membership or a right arising from it.

When transfer rights have been provided, a restriction on them is not binding with respect to a member holding a membership issued before the adoption of the restriction unless the restriction is approved by the members and the affected member.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-60.
Liability of members — Third parties — Dues, assessments, or fees.

A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

When authority to do so is conferred by the articles or bylaws and subject to any limitations, a corporation may levy dues, assessments, or fees upon its members.

The dues, assessments, or fees may be imposed upon all classes of members alike or differently upon different classes of members.

Members of one or more classes may be exempted.

Articles or bylaws may:

Fix the amount of the levy and the method of collection of dues, assessments, or fees;

Authorize the directors to fix the amount from time to time and determine the methods of collection;

Provide for enforcement or collection of dues, assessments, or fees;

Provide for cancellation of membership, on reasonable notice, for nonpayment of dues, assessments, or fees; or

Provide for reinstatement of membership.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-61.
Resignation by members.

A member may resign at any time. The resignation of a member does not relieve the member from any obligations the member may have to the corporation for dues, assessments, or fees or charges for goods or services.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-62.
Termination of membership.

A member may not be expelled or suspended, and a membership may not be terminated or suspended, except pursuant to a procedure that is fair and reasonable and is carried out in good faith. This section does not apply to the termination of a membership at the end of a fixed term.

A procedure is fair and reasonable when it is fair and reasonable taking into consideration all of the relevant facts and circumstances. In addition, a procedure is fair and reasonable if it provides:

Not less than fifteen days’ prior written notice of the expulsion, suspension, or termination, and the reasons for it; and

An opportunity for the member to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five days before the effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination by a person authorized to decide that the proposed expulsion, termination, or suspension not take place.

A proceeding challenging an expulsion, suspension, or termination, including a proceeding in which defective notice is alleged, must be commenced within one year after the effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination.

The expulsion, suspension, or termination of a member does not relieve the member from obligations the member may have to the corporation for dues, assessments, or fees or charges for goods or services.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-63.
Purchase of memberships.

If authorized in its articles or bylaws, a corporation may buy the membership of a member who resigns or whose membership is terminated for the amount and pursuant to the conditions in the articles or bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-64.
Delegates.

A corporation may provide in its articles or bylaws for delegates having some or all the authority of members. The articles or bylaws may set forth provisions relating to:

The characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of the delegates, including their selection and removal;

Calling, noticing, holding, and conducting meetings of delegates; and

Carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-65.
Annual meetings of voting members.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, a corporation with voting members shall hold at least an annual meeting of voting members.

If an annual meeting of voting members has not been held during the preceding fifteen months, at least fifty members with voting rights or ten percent of the members with voting rights, whichever is less, may demand an annual meeting of members by written notice of demand given to the president or the secretary of the corporation. Within thirty days after receipt of the demand, the board shall cause a meeting of members to be called and held at the expense of the corporation on notice no later than ninety days after receipt of the demand. If the board fails to cause a meeting to be called and held as required by this subsection, the members with voting rights making the demand may call the meeting at the expense of the corporation by giving notice as required by section 10-33-68.

An annual meeting of members must be held at the time and place stated in or fixed in accordance with the articles or bylaws. If a place is not stated or if a demand for a meeting is made under subsection 2, the meeting must be held in the county where the principal executive office of the corporation is located. To the extent authorized in the articles or bylaws, the board may determine that an annual meeting of the members shall be held solely by means of remote communication in accordance with subsection 2 of section 10-33-75.

At an annual meeting of members:

There must be an election of successors for directors elected by members and whose terms have expired or whose terms expire at an annual meeting;

There must be a report on the activities and financial condition of the corporation; and

The members shall consider and act upon other matters as may be raised consistent with the notice of meeting requirements.

The failure to hold a meeting in accordance with the articles or bylaws does not affect the validity of a corporate action.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 102.

10-33-66.
Special meetings of voting members.

A corporation with voting members shall hold a special meeting of members:

On call of its board or persons authorized to do so by the articles or bylaws; or

If at least fifty members with voting rights or ten percent of the members with voting rights, whichever is less, sign, date, and deliver to the president or the secretary one or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose for which it is to be held.

Within thirty days after receipt of a demand for a special meeting from voting members, the board shall cause a special meeting to be called and held on notice no later than ninety days after receipt of the demand. If the board fails to cause a special meeting to be called and held as required by this subsection, a voting member making the demand may call the meeting by giving notice pursuant to section 10-33-68. All necessary expenses of the notice and meeting shall be paid by the corporation.

Special meetings of members may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the articles, bylaws, or by the president or the board. If a special meeting is demanded by the members, the meeting must be held in the county where the principal executive office of the corporation is located. To the extent authorized in the articles or bylaws, the board may determine that a special meeting of the members shall be held solely by means of remote communication in accordance with subsection 2 of section 10-33-75.

The notice of a special meeting must contain a statement of the purposes of the meeting and may contain other information required by the articles or bylaws or considered necessary or desirable by the board or by another person calling the meeting.

The business transacted at a special meeting is limited to the purposes stated within the notice of the meeting.

Business transacted at a special meeting that is not included in those stated purposes is voidable by or on behalf of the corporation, unless all of the members with voting rights have waived notice of the meeting pursuant to section 10-33-68.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 103.

10-33-67.
Court-ordered meeting of voting members.

The district court of the county where the principal executive office of a corporation is located may order a meeting to be held:

If a meeting was not held within the earlier of six months after the fiscal yearend of the corporation or fifteen months after its last meeting:

On application of at least fifty members with voting rights or ten percent of the members with voting rights, whichever is less; or

On application of another person entitled to participate in the annual meeting; or

On application of a voting member who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under section 10-33-66 or a person entitled to call a special meeting if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty days after the date the demand was delivered to a corporate officer; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may:

Fix the time and place of the meeting;

Specify a record date for determining members entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting;

Prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice;

Fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting, or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters; and

Enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purposes of the meeting.

If the court orders a meeting, it may also order the corporation to pay the costs of the member, including reasonable attorney’s fees incurred to obtain the order.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-68.
Notice of member meetings.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, notice of meetings of members must be given to every voting member as of the record date determined under section 10-33-69 unless:

The meeting is an adjourned meeting and the date, time, and place of the meeting were announced at the time of adjournment, notice is not required unless a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under section 10-33-69; or

Two consecutive annual meeting notices and notices of any special meetings held during the period between the two annual meetings have been mailed to the member by first-class mail and returned undeliverable.

An action or meeting that is taken or held without notice under subdivision b of subsection 1 has the same force and effect as if notice was given. If the member delivers a written notice of the member’s current address to the corporation, the notice requirement is reinstated.

If notice of an adjourned meeting is required under subdivision a of subsection 1, the date for determination of members entitled to notice and entitled to vote at the adjourned meeting must comply with subsection 1 of section 10-33-69, except that if the date of the meeting is set by court order, the court may provide the original date of determination will continue in effect or fix a new date.

The notice:

In all cases when a specific minimum notice period has not been fixed by law, must be given at least five days before the date of the meeting, or a shorter time provided in the articles or bylaws, and not more than fifty days before the date of the meeting;

Must contain the date, time, and place of the meeting;

Must inform members if proxies are permitted at the meeting and, if so, state the procedure for appointing proxies;

Must contain a statement of the purpose of the meeting, in the case of a special meeting;

Must contain any other information required by the articles or bylaws, this chapter, or considered necessary or desirable by the board; and

May contain any other information considered necessary or desirable by the person calling the meeting.

A member may waive notice of a meeting of members.

A waiver of notice by a member entitled to notice is effective:

Whether given before, at, or after the meeting; and

Whether given in writing, orally, or by attendance.

Attendance by a member at a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting, unless the member:

Objects at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened; or

Objects before a vote on an item of business because the item may not lawfully be considered at that meeting and does not participate in the consideration of the item at that meeting.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.